California statutes. Water Code
The plan shall include information, to the extent practicable, relating to the quality of existing sources of water available to the supplier over the same five-year increments as described in subdivision (a) of Section 10631, and the manner in which water quality affects water management strategies and supply reliability.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 644, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Water Service Reliability [10635. - 10635.]

10635.

(a) Every urban water supplier shall include, as part of its urban water management plan, an assessment of the reliability of its water service to its customers during normal, dry, and multiple dry water years. This water supply and demand assessment shall compare the total water supply sources available to the water supplier with the long-term total projected water use over the next 20 years, in five-year increments, for a normal water year, a single dry water year, and a drought lasting five consecutive water years. The water service reliability assessment shall be based upon the information compiled pursuant to Section 10631, including available data from state, regional, or local agency
 population projections within the service area of the urban water supplier.

(b) Every urban water supplier shall include, as part of its urban water management plan, a drought risk assessment for its water service to its customers as part of information considered in developing the demand management measures and water supply projects and programs to be included in the urban water management plan. The urban water supplier may conduct an interim update or updates to this drought risk assessment within the five-year cycle of its urban water management plan update. The drought risk assessment shall include each of the following:

(1) A description of the data, methodology, and basis for one or more supply shortage conditions that are necessary to conduct a drought
 risk assessment for a drought period that lasts five
 consecutive water years, starting from the year following when the assessment is conducted.

(2) A determination of the reliability of each source of supply under a variety of water shortage conditions. This may include a determination that a particular source of water supply is fully reliable under most, if not all, conditions.

(3) A comparison of the total water supply sources available to the water supplier with the total projected water use for the drought period.

(4) Considerations of the historical drought hydrology, plausible changes on projected supplies and demands under climate change conditions, anticipated regulatory changes, and other locally applicable criteria.

(c) The urban water supplier shall provide that portion of its urban water management plan prepared pursuant to this article to any city or county within which it provides water supplies no later than 60 days after the submission of its urban water management plan.

(d) Nothing in this article is intended to create a right or entitlement to water service or any specific level of water service.

(e) Nothing in this article is intended to change existing law concerning an urban water supplier’s obligation to provide water service to its existing customers or to any potential future customers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 36.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Adoption and Implementation of Plans [10640. - 10645.]

10640.

(a) Every urban water supplier required to prepare a plan pursuant to this part shall prepare its plan pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 10630). The supplier shall likewise periodically review the plan as required by Section 10621, and any amendments or changes required as a result of that review shall be adopted pursuant to this article.

(b) Every urban water supplier required to prepare a water shortage contingency plan shall prepare a water shortage contingency plan pursuant to Section 10632. The supplier shall likewise periodically review the water shortage contingency plan as required by paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) of
 Section 10632 and any amendments or changes required as a result of that review shall be adopted pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 37.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10641.

An urban water supplier required to prepare a plan or a water shortage contingency plan may consult with, and obtain comments from, any public agency or state agency or any person who has special expertise with respect to water demand management methods and techniques.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 38.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10642.

Each urban water supplier shall encourage the active involvement of diverse social, cultural, and economic elements of the population within the service area prior to and during the preparation of both the plan and the water shortage contingency plan. Prior to adopting either, the urban water supplier shall make both the plan and the water shortage contingency plan available for public inspection and shall hold a public hearing or hearings thereon. Prior to any of these hearings, notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be published within the jurisdiction of the publicly owned water supplier pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code. The urban water supplier shall provide notice of the time and place of a
 hearing to any city or county within which the supplier provides water supplies. Notices by a local public agency pursuant to this section shall be provided pursuant to Chapter 17.5 (commencing with Section 7290) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code. A privately owned water supplier shall provide an equivalent notice within its service area. After the hearing or hearings, the plan or water shortage contingency plan shall be adopted as prepared or as modified after the hearing or hearings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 39.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10643.

An urban water supplier shall implement its plan adopted pursuant to this chapter in accordance with the schedule set forth in its plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1009, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10644.

(a) (1) An urban water supplier shall submit to the department, the California State Library, and any city or county within which the supplier provides water supplies a copy of its plan no later than 30 days after adoption. Copies of amendments or changes to the plans shall be submitted to the department, the California State Library, and any city or county within which the supplier provides water supplies within 30 days after adoption.

(2) The plan, or amendments to the plan, submitted to the department pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted electronically and shall include any standardized forms, tables, or displays specified by the department.

(b) If an urban water supplier revises its water shortage contingency plan, the supplier shall submit to the department a copy of its water shortage contingency plan prepared pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 10632 no later than 30 days after adoption, in accordance with protocols for submission and using electronic reporting tools developed by the department.

(c) (1) (A) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall prepare and submit to the Legislature, on or before July 1, in the years ending in seven and two, a report summarizing the status of the plans and water shortage contingency plans adopted pursuant to this part. The report prepared by the department shall identify the exemplary elements of the
 individual plans and water shortage contingency plans. The department shall provide a copy of the report to each urban water supplier that has submitted its plan and water shortage contingency plan to the department. The department shall also prepare reports and provide data for any legislative hearings designed to consider the effectiveness of plans and water shortage contingency plans submitted pursuant to this part.

(B) The department shall prepare and submit to the board, on or before September 30 of each year, a report summarizing the submitted water supply and demand assessment results along with appropriate reported water shortage conditions and the regional and statewide analysis of water supply conditions developed by the department. As part of the report, the department shall provide a summary and, as appropriate, urban
 water supplier specific information regarding various shortage response actions implemented as a result of annual supplier-specific water supply and demand assessments performed pursuant to Section 10632.1.

(C) The department shall submit the report to the Legislature for the 2015 plans by July 1, 2017, and the report to the Legislature for the 2020 plans and water shortage contingency plans by July 1, 2022.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(d) The department shall make available to the public the standard the department will use to identify exemplary water demand management
 measures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 40.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10645.

(a) Not later than 30 days after filing a copy of its plan with the department, the urban water supplier and the department shall make the plan available for public review during normal business hours.

(b) Not later than 30 days after filing a copy of its water shortage contingency plan with the department, the urban water supplier and the department shall make the plan available for public review during normal business hours.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 41.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Miscellaneous Provisions [10650. - 10657.]

10650.

Any actions or proceedings, other than actions by the board, to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul the acts or decisions of an urban water supplier on the grounds of noncompliance with this part shall be commenced as follows:

(a) An action or proceeding alleging failure to adopt a plan or a water shortage contingency plan shall be commenced within 18 months after that adoption is required by this part.

(b) Any action or proceeding alleging that a plan or water shortage contingency plan, or action taken pursuant to either, does not comply with this part shall be commenced within 90 days after filing
 of the plan or water shortage contingency plan or an amendment to either pursuant to Section 10644 or the taking of that action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 42.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10651.

In any action or proceeding to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul a plan or a water shortage contingency plan, or an action taken pursuant to either by an urban water supplier on the grounds of noncompliance with this part, the inquiry shall extend only to whether there was a prejudicial abuse of discretion. Abuse of discretion is established if the supplier has not proceeded in a manner required by law or if the action by the water supplier is not supported by substantial evidence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 43.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10652.

The California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) does not apply to the preparation and adoption of plans pursuant to this part or to the implementation of actions taken pursuant to Section 10632. Nothing in this part shall be interpreted as exempting from the California Environmental Quality Act any project that would significantly affect water supplies for fish and wildlife, or any project for implementation of the plan, other than projects implementing Section 10632, or any project for expanded or additional water supplies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 854, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10653.

The adoption of a plan shall satisfy any requirements of state law, regulation, or order, including those of the board and the Public Utilities Commission, for the preparation of water management plans, water shortage contingency plans, or conservation plans; provided, that if the board or the Public Utilities Commission requires additional information concerning water conservation, drought response measures, or financial conditions to implement its existing authority, nothing in this part shall be deemed to limit the board or the commission in obtaining that information. The requirements of this part shall be satisfied by any urban water demand management plan that complies with analogous federal laws or regulations after the
 effective date of this part, and which substantially meets the requirements of this
 part, or by any existing urban water management plan which includes the contents of a plan required under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 44.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10654.

An urban water supplier may recover in its rates the costs incurred in preparing its urban water management plan, its drought risk assessment, its water supply and demand assessment, and its water shortage contingency plan and implementing the reasonable water conservation measures included in either of the plans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 45.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10655.

If any provision of this part or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this part which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application thereof, and to this end the provisions of this part are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1009, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10656.

An urban water supplier is not eligible for a water grant or loan awarded or administered by the state unless the urban water supplier complies with this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 46.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10657.

The department may adopt regulations regarding the definitions of water, water use, and reporting periods, and may adopt any other regulations deemed necessary or desirable to implement this part. In developing regulations pursuant to this section, the department shall solicit broad public participation from stakeholders and other interested persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 47.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2.7. GROUNDWATER RESOURCES [10700. - 10717.]

10700.

This part applies only to the area within the existing boundaries of the Mendocino City Community Services District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 472, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10701.

(a) As used in this part, “local agency” means any city, county, district, agency, or other political subdivision of the state for the local performance of governmental or proprietary functions within limited boundaries.

(b) As used in this part, “groundwater” and “groundwater resources” do not include those subsurface waters incidentally produced in connection with or as a result of natural resource extraction activities when the disposal of those subsurface waters is regulated by state or federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 472, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10702.

Any local agency which is authorized by law to provide water services may, by ordinance, or by resolution if the local agency is not authorized to act by ordinance, establish programs for the management of groundwater resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 472, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10703.

Prior to the adoption of a groundwater management program, the governing board of the local agency shall hold a public hearing, after publication of notice pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, on the proposed groundwater management program. At the hearing, the board may alter the program or require further study on the program and continue the hearing. At the conclusion of the hearing, the board may adopt a resolution of intention to adopt and implement the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 472, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10704.

After the conclusion of the hearing, and if the governing board adopts a resolution of intention, copies of the groundwater management program shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation. Upon written request, any interested person shall be provided with a copy of the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 472, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10705.

After the adoption of a resolution of intention, the governing board shall hold a second hearing and consider protests to the implementation of the program. Any interested person may appear to be heard concerning any matter set forth in the resolution or matters material thereto. Any time prior to the conclusion of the hearing, any eligible registered voter of the local agency may file a written protest or withdraw a protest previously filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 472, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10706.

A majority protest shall be determined to exist if the governing board finds that the protests filed and not withdrawn prior to the conclusion of the second hearing represent more than 50 percent of the eligible registered voters residing within the boundaries of the local agency.

If the governing board finds that a majority protest exists, the groundwater management program shall be abandoned and no new program shall be considered by the board for a period of one year following the date of the second hearing. If a majority protest has not been filed, the board, within 35 days after the conclusion of the second hearing, may adopt an ordinance or resolution to implement the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 472, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10707.

A local agency authorized to establish programs for the management of groundwater resources pursuant to this part may for that purpose enter into a joint powers agreement pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 472, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10708.

A local agency which establishes a program for the management of groundwater resources pursuant to this part may fix and collect rates for the extraction of groundwater to pay expenses incurred by the local agency for purposes of groundwater management.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 472, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10709.

For purposes of groundwater management, a local agency authorized to establish programs for the management of groundwater resources pursuant to this part may, in addition to the powers set forth in this act, exercise any of the powers of a water replenishment district under Part 4 (commencing with Section 60220) of Division 18 and may levy a water replenishment assessment in accordance with Part 6 (commencing with Section 60300) of Division 18.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 472, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10710.

Before a local agency may levy a water replenishment assessment as authorized in Section 10709 or may otherwise fix and collect rates for the extraction of groundwater pursuant to this part, the local agency shall hold an election on the proposition of whether or not the local agency shall be authorized to levy a water replenishment assessment or to fix and collect rates for the extraction of groundwater, and a majority of the votes cast at the election shall be in favor of the proposition. The election shall be conducted in the manner prescribed by the principal act of the local agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 472, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10711.

No local agency shall exercise the powers authorized by this part within the boundaries of another local agency authorized by law to provide water service to any or all of the lands within its boundaries, without the prior agreement of the governing body of that other local agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 472, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10712.

No local agency shall exercise the powers authorized by this part within the boundaries of another local agency providing water service to any or all of the lands within its boundaries, without the prior agreement of the governing body of that other local agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 472, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10713.

If a local agency annexes land subject to a groundwater management program of another local agency, the local agency annexing the land shall continue to comply with the groundwater management program for the annexed property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 472, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10714.

This part neither preempts, negates, affects, nor infers the existence of any powers of a local agency in other groundwater basins of the state to establish programs for the management of groundwater resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 472, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10715.

This part is in addition to, and not a limitation on, any powers of a local agency otherwise granted by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 472, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10716.

This part does not exempt any local agency formed under any act requiring the approval of its leases, contracts, or issuance of securities by the Treasurer from obtaining the report, investigation, and approval of the Treasurer as required by that act or by the District Securities Investigation Law of 1965.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 472, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10717.

A local agency shall no longer be authorized to exercise the powers conferred by this part upon the completion and implementation of a municipal central water system supplying water to the inhabitants within the boundaries of the local agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 472, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2.74. Sustainable Groundwater Management [10720. - 10738.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [10720. - 10720.9.]

10720.

This part shall be known, and may be cited, as the “Sustainable Groundwater Management Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 346, Sec. 3.   (SB 1168)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10720.1.

In enacting this part, it is the intent of the Legislature to do all of the following:

(a) To provide for the sustainable management of groundwater basins.

(b) To enhance local management of groundwater consistent with rights to use or store groundwater and Section 2 of Article X of the California Constitution. It is the intent of the Legislature to preserve the security of water rights in the state to the greatest extent possible consistent with the sustainable management of groundwater.

(c) To establish minimum standards for sustainable groundwater management.

(d) To provide local groundwater agencies with the authority and the technical and financial assistance necessary to sustainably manage groundwater.

(e) To avoid or minimize subsidence.

(f) To improve data collection and understanding about groundwater.

(g) To increase groundwater storage and remove impediments to recharge.

(h) To manage groundwater basins through the actions of local governmental agencies to the greatest extent feasible, while minimizing state intervention to only when necessary to ensure that local agencies manage groundwater in a sustainable manner.

(i) To provide a more efficient and cost-effective groundwater adjudication process that protects water
 rights, ensures due process, prevents unnecessary delay, and furthers the objectives of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 676, Sec. 2.   (SB 226)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10720.3.

(a) This part applies to all groundwater basins in the state.

(b) To the extent authorized under federal or tribal law, this part applies to an Indian tribe and to the federal government, including, but not limited to, the United States Department of Defense.

(c) The federal government or any federally recognized Indian tribe, appreciating the shared interest in assuring the sustainability of groundwater resources, may voluntarily agree to participate in the preparation or administration of a groundwater sustainability plan or groundwater management plan under this part through a joint powers authority or other agreement with local
 agencies in the basin. A participating tribe shall be eligible to participate fully in planning, financing, and management under this part, including eligibility for grants and technical assistance, if any exercise of regulatory authority, enforcement, or imposition and collection of fees is pursuant to the tribe’s independent authority and not pursuant to authority granted to a groundwater sustainability agency under this part.

(d) In an adjudication of rights to the use of groundwater, and in the management of a groundwater basin or subbasin by a groundwater sustainability agency or by the board, federally reserved water rights to groundwater shall be respected in full. In case of conflict between federal and state law in that adjudication or management, federal law shall prevail. The voluntary or involuntary participation of a holder of rights in that adjudication or management shall not subject that holder to state law regarding other
 proceedings or matters not authorized by federal law. This subdivision is declaratory of existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 346, Sec. 3.   (SB 1168)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10720.5.

(a) Groundwater management pursuant to this part shall be consistent with Section 2 of Article X of the California Constitution. Nothing in this part modifies rights or priorities to use or store groundwater consistent with Section 2 of Article X of the California Constitution, except that in basins designated medium- or high-priority basins by the department, no extraction of groundwater between January 1, 2015, and the date of adoption of a groundwater sustainability plan pursuant to this part or the approval by the department of an alternative submitted under Section 10733.6, whichever is sooner, may be used as evidence of, or to establish or defend against, any claim of prescription.

(b) Nothing in this part, or in
 any groundwater management plan adopted pursuant to this part, determines or alters surface water rights or groundwater rights under common law or any provision of law that determines or grants surface water rights.

(c) Water rights may be determined in an adjudication action pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 676, Sec. 3.   (SB 226)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10720.7.

(a) (1) By January 31, 2020, all basins designated as high- or medium-priority basins by the department that have been designated in Bulletin 118, as it may be updated or revised on or before January 1, 2017, as basins that are subject to critical conditions of overdraft shall be managed under a groundwater sustainability plan or coordinated groundwater sustainability plans pursuant to this part.

(2) By January 31, 2022, all basins designated as high- or medium-priority basins by the department that are not subject to paragraph (1) shall be managed under a groundwater sustainability plan or coordinated groundwater sustainability plans pursuant to this part.

(b) The Legislature encourages and authorizes basins designated as low- and very low priority basins by the department to be managed under groundwater sustainability plans pursuant to this part. Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 10735) does not apply to a basin designated as a low- or very low priority basin.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 255, Sec. 3.   (SB 13)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10720.8.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (e), this part does not apply to the following adjudicated areas or a local agency that conforms to the requirements of an adjudication of water rights for one of the following adjudicated areas:

(1) Beaumont Basin.

(2) Brite Basin.

(3) Central Basin.

(4) Chino Basin.

(5) Cucamonga Basin.

(6) Cummings Basin.

(7) Goleta Basin.

(8) Lytle Basin.

(9) Main San Gabriel Basin.

(10) Mojave Basin Area.

(11) Puente Basin.

(12) Raymond Basin.

(13) Rialto-Colton Basin.

(14) Riverside Basin.

(15) San Bernardino Basin Area.

(16) San Jacinto Basin.

(17) Santa Margarita River Watershed.

(18) Santa Maria Valley Basin.

(19) Santa Paula Basin.

(20) Scott River Stream System.

(21) Seaside Basin.

(22) Six Basins.

(23) Tehachapi Basin.

(24) Upper Los Angeles River Area.

(25) Warren Valley Basin.

(26) West Coast Basin.

(b) The Antelope Valley basin at issue in the Antelope Valley Groundwater Cases (Judicial Council Coordination Proceeding Number 4408) shall be
 treated as an adjudicated basin pursuant to this section if the superior court issues a final judgment, order, or decree.

(c) Any groundwater basin or portion of a groundwater basin in Inyo County managed pursuant to the terms of the stipulated judgment in City of Los Angeles v. Board of Supervisors of the County of Inyo, et al. (Inyo County Case No. 12908) shall be treated as an adjudicated area pursuant to this section.

(d) The Los Osos Groundwater Basin at issue in Los Osos Community Service District v. Southern California Water Company [Golden State Water Company] et al. (San Luis Obispo County Superior Court Case No. CV 040126) shall be treated as an adjudicated basin pursuant to this section if the superior court issues a final judgment, order, or decree.

(e) If an adjudication action has determined the rights
 to extract groundwater for only a portion of a basin, subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (d) apply only within the area for which the adjudication action has determined those rights.

(f) The watermaster or a local agency within a basin identified in subdivision (a) shall do all of the following:

(1) By April 1, 2016, submit to the department a copy of a governing final judgment, or other judicial order or decree, and any amendments entered before April 1, 2016.

(2) Within 90 days of entry by a court, submit to the department a copy of any amendment made and entered by the court to the governing final judgment or other judicial order or decree on or after April 1, 2016.

(3) By April 1, 2016, and annually thereafter, submit to the department a report
 containing the following information to the extent available for the portion of the basin subject to the adjudication:

(A) Groundwater elevation data unless otherwise submitted pursuant to Section 10932.

(B) Annual aggregated data identifying groundwater extraction for the preceding water year.

(C) Surface water supply used for or available for use for groundwater recharge or in-lieu use.

(D) Total water use.

(E) Change in groundwater storage.

(F) The annual report submitted to the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 346, Sec. 3.   (SB 1168)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10720.9.

All relevant state agencies, including, but not limited to, the board, the regional water quality control boards, the department, and the Department of Fish and Wildlife, shall consider the policies of this part, and any groundwater sustainability plans adopted pursuant to this part, when revising or adopting policies, regulations, or criteria, or when issuing orders or determinations, where pertinent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 346, Sec. 3.   (SB 1168)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Definitions [10721. - 10721.]

10721.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this part:

(a) “Adjudication action” means an action filed in the superior or federal district court to determine the rights to extract groundwater from a basin or store water within a basin, including, but not limited to, actions to quiet title respecting rights to extract or store groundwater or an action brought to impose a physical solution on a basin.

(b) “Basin” means a groundwater basin or subbasin identified and defined in Bulletin 118 or as modified pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10722).

(c) “Bulletin 118” means the department’s report entitled
 “California’s Groundwater: Bulletin 118” updated in 2003, as it may be subsequently updated or revised in accordance with Section 12924.

(d) “Coordination agreement” means a legal agreement adopted between two or more groundwater sustainability agencies that provides the basis for coordinating multiple agencies or groundwater sustainability plans within a basin pursuant to this part.

(e) “De minimis extractor” means a person who extracts, for domestic purposes, two acre-feet or less per year.

(f) “Governing body” means the legislative body of a groundwater sustainability agency.

(g) “Groundwater” means water beneath the surface of the earth within
 the zone below the water table in which the soil is completely saturated with water, but does not include water that flows in known and definite channels unless included pursuant to Section 10722.5.

(h) “Groundwater extraction facility” means a device or method for extracting groundwater from within a basin.

(i) “Groundwater recharge” or “recharge” means the augmentation of groundwater, by natural or artificial means.

(j) “Groundwater sustainability agency” means one or more local agencies that implement the provisions of this part. For purposes of imposing fees pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 10730) or taking action to enforce a groundwater sustainability plan, “groundwater sustainability agency” also means
 each local agency comprising the groundwater sustainability agency if the plan authorizes separate agency action.

(k) “Groundwater sustainability plan” or “plan” means a plan of a groundwater sustainability agency proposed or adopted pursuant to this part.

(l) “Groundwater sustainability program” means a coordinated and ongoing activity undertaken to benefit a basin, pursuant to a groundwater sustainability plan.

(m) “In-lieu use” means the use of surface water by persons that could otherwise extract groundwater in order to leave groundwater in the basin.

(n) “Local agency” means a local public agency that has water supply, water management,
 or land use responsibilities within a groundwater basin.

(o) “Operator” means a person operating a groundwater extraction facility. The owner of a groundwater extraction facility shall be conclusively presumed to be the operator unless a satisfactory showing is made to the governing body of the groundwater sustainability agency that the groundwater extraction facility actually is operated by some other person.

(p) “Owner” means a person owning a groundwater extraction facility or an interest in a groundwater extraction facility other than a lien to secure the payment of a debt or other obligation.

(q) “Personal information” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1798.3 of the Civil Code.

(r) “Planning and implementation horizon” means a 50-year time period over which a groundwater sustainability agency determines that plans and measures will be implemented in a basin to ensure that the basin is operated within its sustainable yield.

(s) “Public water system” has the same meaning as defined in Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code.

(t) “Recharge area” means the area that supplies water to an aquifer in a groundwater basin.

(u) “Sustainability goal” means the existence and implementation of one or more groundwater sustainability plans that achieve sustainable groundwater management by identifying and causing the implementation of measures
 targeted to ensure that the applicable basin is operated within its sustainable yield.

(v) “Sustainable groundwater management” means the management and use of groundwater in a manner that can be maintained during the planning and implementation horizon without causing undesirable results.

(w) “Sustainable yield” means the maximum quantity of water, calculated over a base period representative of long-term conditions in the basin and including any temporary surplus, that can be withdrawn annually from a groundwater supply without causing an undesirable result.

(x) “Undesirable result” means one or more of the following effects caused by groundwater conditions occurring throughout the basin:

(1) Chronic lowering of groundwater levels indicating a significant and unreasonable depletion of supply if continued over the planning and implementation horizon. Overdraft during a period of drought is not sufficient to establish a chronic lowering of groundwater levels if extractions and groundwater recharge are managed as necessary to ensure that reductions in groundwater levels or storage during a period of drought are offset by increases in groundwater levels or storage during other periods.

(2) Significant and unreasonable reduction of groundwater storage.

(3) Significant and unreasonable seawater intrusion.

(4) Significant and unreasonable degraded water
 quality, including the migration of contaminant plumes that impair water supplies.

(5) Significant and unreasonable land subsidence that substantially interferes with surface land uses.

(6) Depletions of interconnected surface water that have significant and unreasonable adverse impacts on beneficial uses of the surface water.

(y) “Water budget” means an accounting of the total groundwater and surface water entering and leaving a basin including the changes in the amount of water stored.

(z) “Watermaster” means a watermaster appointed by a court or pursuant to other law.

(aa) “Water
 year” means the period from October 1 through the following September 30, inclusive.

(ab) “Wellhead protection area” means the surface and subsurface area surrounding a water well or well field that supplies a public water system through which contaminants are reasonably likely to migrate toward the water well or well field.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 255, Sec. 1.   (AB 1944)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Basin Boundaries [10722. - 10722.5.]

10722.

Unless other basin boundaries are established pursuant to this chapter, a basin’s boundaries shall be as identified in Bulletin 118.
